Maryland, session 2026, HB0499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated unless a
different meaning is clearly intended from the context.
(y) “Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached
to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent
to sign the record.
3–506.
(a) (1) A copy of a list of registered voters shall be provided to a Maryland
registered voter on receipt of:
(i) a written application; and
(ii) a statement, signed under oath, that the list is not intended to be
used for:
1. commercial solicitation; or
2. any other purpose not related to the electoral process.
(2) In consultation with the local boards, the State Board shall adopt
regulations that specify:
(i) the time for a list to be provided under this subsection;
(ii) the authorization to be required for providing a list;
(iii) the fee to be paid for providing a list;
(iv) the information to be included on a list;
(v) that the residence address of an individual who is a participant
in an address confidentiality program may not be disclosed;
(vi) that a participant in an address confidentiality program is not
required to apply to the State Board to keep the individual’s residence address confidential;
(vii) the format of the information; [and]

HOUSE BILL 499 3
(viii) the medium or media on which the information is to be provided;
AND
(IX) REQUIREMENTS FOR SECURE STORAGE AND USE OF VOTER
DATA.
6–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) “Circulator” means an individual who attests to one or more signatures affixed
to a petition.
(i) “Petition” means all of the associated pages necessary to fulfill the
requirements of a process established by the law by which individuals affix their signatures
as evidence of support for:
(1) placing the name of an individual, the names of individuals, or a
question on the ballot at any election;
(2) the creation of a new political party; or
(3) the appointment of a charter board under Article XI–A, § 1A of the
Maryland Constitution.
6–103.
(a) (1) The State Board shall adopt regulations, consistent with this title, to
carry out the provisions of this title.
(2) The regulations shall:
(i) prescribe the form and content of petitions;
(ii) specify procedures for the circulation of petitions for signatures,
INCLUDING THE COLLECTION OF ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES;
(III) SPECIFY THE REQUIREMENTS FOR THE VERIFICATION OF
ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES ON ANY ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE PAGE;
(IV) SPECIFY REQUIREMENTS FOR ACCESSIBILITY OF
ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE PAGES FOR PEOPLE WITH DISABILITIES;
[(iii)] (V) specify procedures for the verification and counting of
signatures; and

HOUSE BILL 499
[(iv)] (VI) provide any other procedural or technical requirements
that the State Board considers appropriate.
6–203.
(a) To sign a petition, an individual shall:
(1) sign the individual’s name [as it appears on the statewide voter
registration list or the individual’s surname of registration and at least one full given name
and the initials of any other names]; and
(2) include the following information, printed or typed, in the spaces
provided:
(i) the signer’s name as it was signed;
(ii) the signer’s address;
(iii) the date of signing; and
(iv) other information required by regulations adopted by the State
Board.
(b) ANY INFORMATION REQUESTED FROM AN INDIVIDUAL SIGNING A
PETITION THAT IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
BE CLEARLY MARKED AS OPTIONAL ON ANY SIGNATURE PAGE.
(C) The signature of an individual shall be validated and counted if:
(1) the requirements of subsection (a) of this section have been satisfied;
(2) THE IDENTITY OF THE INDIVIDUAL REASONABLY CAN BE
DETERMINED USING THE INFORMATION REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS
SECTION;
(3) the individual is a registered voter assigned to the county specified on
the signature page and, if applicable, in a particular geographic area of the county;
[(3) the individual has not previously signed the same petition;]
(4) the signature is attested by an affidavit appearing on the page on which
the signature appears;
(5) the date accompanying the signature is not later than the date of the
affidavit on the page; and

HOUSE BILL 499 5
(6) if applicable, the signature was affixed within the requisite period of
time, as specified by law.
(D) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
THE ELECTION AUTHORITY REASONABLY CAN CONFIRM THE IDENTITY OF AN
INDIVIDUAL, THE ELECTION AUTHORITY MAY NOT INVALIDATE THE INDIVIDUAL’S
SIGNATURE BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL SIGNED A PETITION USING A DERIVATIVE OF
THE INDIVIDUAL’S GIVEN NAME.
(2) IF AN INDIVIDUAL’S SURNAME ON A PETITION DOES NOT EXACTLY
MATCH THE INDIVIDUAL’S SURNAME AS IT APPEARS IN THE INDIVIDUAL’S VOTER
REGISTRATION RECORD, THE ELECTION AUTHORITY SHALL INVALIDATE THE
INDIVIDUAL’S SIGNATURE.
(E) IF AN INDIVIDUAL SIGNS THE SAME PETITION MORE THAN ONCE:
(1) THE FIRST SIGNATURE OF THAT INDIVIDUAL TO BE VALIDATED
SHALL BE COUNTED; AND
(2) ANY SUBSEQUENT SIGNATURE OF THAT INDIVIDUAL ON THE SAME
PETITION SHALL BE INVALIDATED.
(F) (1) A PETITION MAY CONTAIN THE ELECTRONIC SIGNATURES OF:
(I) INDIVIDUALS SIGNING THE PETITION; OR
(II) CIRCULATORS CIRCULATING ANY OF THE SIGNATURE
PAGES FILED WITH THE PETITION.
(2) (I) AN ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE SHALL BE ELECTRONICALLY
SIGNED, TYPED, OR AFFIXED ONTO A FORM PRESCRIBED BY THE STATE BOARD.
(II) AN ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE MUST REFLECT THE
AFFIRMATIVE ACTION OF THE SIGNER TO ELECTRONICALLY SIGN, TYPE, OR AFFIX
THE SIGNER’S NAME ONTO THE SIGNATURE PAGE OF A PETITION.
(3) (I) THE CIRCULATOR WHO ATTESTS TO AN ELECTRONIC
SIGNATURE ON A PETITION SHALL PERSONALLY OBSERVE THE SIGNER OF THE
ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE WHILE THE SIGNER IS PROVIDING THE SIGNATURE.
(II) A CIRCULATOR MAY NOT ATTEST TO THE PERSONAL
OBSERVATION OF AN ELECTRONIC SIGNATURE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH IF THE CIRCULATOR WITNESSED THE SIGNING REMOTELY.

HOUSE BILL 499
[(c)] (G) (1) A signature may be removed:
(i) by the signer upon written application to the election authority
with which the petition will be filed if the application is received by the election authority
prior to the filing of that signature; or
(ii) prior to the filing of that signature, by the circulator who attested
to that signature or by the sponsor of the petition, if it is concluded that the signature does
not satisfy the requirements of this title.
(2) A signature removed pursuant to paragraph (1)(ii) of this subsection
may not be included in the number of signatures stated on the information page included
in the petition.
6–204.
(a) Each signature page shall contain an affidavit made and executed by the
individual in whose presence all of the signatures on that page were affixed and who
observed each of those signatures being affixed.
(b) The affidavit shall contain the statements, required by regulation, designed
to assure the validity of the signatures and the fairness of the petition process.
(c) A circulator must be at least 18 years old at the time any of the signatures
covered by the affidavit are affixed.
(D) AN INDIVIDUAL SIGNER MAY:
(1) EXECUTE AS CIRCULATOR AN AFFIDAVIT THAT COVERS THE
INDIVIDUAL’S OWN SIGNATURE; AND
(2) ATTEST IN THE AFFIDAVIT TO THE VALIDITY OF THE INDIVIDUAL’S
OWN SIGNATURE.
6–208.1.
(A) AFTER THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL OF THE ELECTION AUTHORITY
NOTIFIES THE SPONSOR OF A DEFICIENCY IN A PETITION UNDER § 6–208 OF THIS
SUBTITLE, THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL SHALL MAKE AVAILABLE TO THE
SPONSOR A PHYSICAL OR ELECTRONIC COPY OF THE PETITION THAT INDICATES THE
PARTICULAR DEFICIENCIES FOR EACH INVALIDATED SIGNATURE NOT LATER THAN
THE EARLIER OF:
(1) 85 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE ELECTION TO WHICH THE
PETITION RELATES; OR

HOUSE BILL 499 7
(2) ANY OTHER APPLICABLE DEADLINE ESTABLISHED UNDER LAW.
(B) THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL MAY CHARGE A REASONABLE FEE THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED THE COST OF PRODUCING THE COPY OF THE PETITION REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
(C) (1) AN ELIGIBLE REGISTERED VOTER WHO SIGNED A PETITION BUT
WHOSE SIGNATURE WAS INVALIDATED MAY CORRECT TECHNICAL DEFICIENCIES,
INCLUDING MISSING, PARTIAL, OR MISSPELLED NAMES, ADDRESSES, OR DATES, BY
SUBMITTING A NEW SIGNATURE PAGE TO THE ELECTION AUTHORITY USING ANY
METHOD OF SUBMISSION AUTHORIZED BY THIS TITLE NOT LATER THAN THE
EARLIER OF:
(I) 85 DAYS BEFORE THE DATE OF THE ELECTION TO WHICH
THE PETITION RELATES; OR
(II) ANY OTHER APPLICABLE DEADLINE ESTABLISHED UNDER
LAW.
(2) PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT ALLOW NEW
SIGNATURES TO BE ADDED TO A PETITION AFTER THE DEADLINE FOR SUBMISSION
OF THE PETITION UNDER APPLICABLE LAW.
6–210.
(b) Within 2 business days after an advance determination under § 6–202 of this
subtitle, or a determination of deficiency under § 6–206 or § 6–208 of this subtitle, the chief
election official of the election authority shall notify the sponsor of the determination.
(C) THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL SHALL MAKE A COPY OF A PETITION
AVAILABLE TO THE SPONSOR UNDER § 6–208.1(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) WITHIN 1 BUSINESS DAY AFTER PAYMENT OF ANY FEE REQUIRED
UNDER § 6–208.1(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) IF A FEE IS NOT REQUIRED UNDER § 6–208.1(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
WITHIN 1 BUSINESS DAY AFTER THE CHIEF ELECTION OFFICIAL NOTIFIES THE
SPONSOR OF A DEFICIENCY IN A PETITION UNDER § 6–208.1(A)(2) OF THIS
SUBTITLE.
[(c)] (D) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the
verification and counting of validated signatures on a petition shall be completed within 20
days after the filing of the petition.

HOUSE BILL 499
(2) If a petition seeks to place the name of an individual on the ballot for a
special election, the verification and counting of validated signatures on the petition shall
be completed within 10 days after the filing of the petition.
[(d)] (E) Within 1 business day of the completion of the verification and counting
processes, or, if judicial review is pending, within 1 business day after a final judicial
decision, the appropriate election official shall make the certifications required by § 6–208
of this subtitle.
[(e)] (F) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, any
judicial review of a determination, as provided in § 6–209 of this subtitle, shall be sought
by the 10th day following the DATE THE SPONSOR IS NOTIFIED OF THE determination to
which the judicial review relates.
(2) (i) If the petition seeks to place the name of an individual or a
question on the ballot at any election, except a presidential primary election, judicial review
shall be sought by the day specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection or the 69th day
preceding that election, whichever day is earlier.
(ii) If the petition seeks to place the name of an individual on the
ballot for a presidential primary election in accordance with § 8–502 of this article, judicial
review of a determination made under § 6–208(a)(2) of this subtitle shall be sought by the
5th day following the DATE THE SPONSOR IS NOTIFIED OF THE determination to which
the judicial review relates.
(iii) If the petition seeks to place the name of an individual on the
ballot for a special election, judicial review shall be sought by the 2nd day following the
DATE THE SPONSOR IS NOTIFIED OF THE determination to which the judicial review
relates.
(3) (i) A judicial proceeding under this subsection shall be conducted in
accordance with the Maryland Rules, except that:
1. the case shall be heard and decided without a jury and as
expeditiously as the circumstances require; and
2. an appeal shall be taken directly to the Supreme Court of
Maryland within 5 days after the date of the decision of the circuit court.
(ii) The Supreme Court of Maryland shall give priority to hear and
decide an appeal brought under subparagraph (i)2 of this paragraph as expeditiously as the
circumstances require.
16–401.
(a) A person may not willfully and knowingly:

HOUSE BILL 499 9
(1) give, transfer, promise, or offer anything of value for the purpose of
inducing another person to sign or not sign any petition;
(2) request, receive, or agree to receive, anything of value as an inducement
to sign or not to sign any petition;
(3) misrepresent any fact for the purpose of inducing another person to sign
or not to sign any petition;
(4) sign the name of any other person to a petition;
(5) falsify any signature or purported signature to a petition;
(6) [obtain, or attempt to obtain, any signature to a petition by fraud,
duress, or force] INDUCE, OR ATTEMPT TO INDUCE, ANOTHER PERSON TO SIGN OR
NOT TO SIGN ANY PETITION THROUGH THE USE OF FORCE, THREAT, MENACE,
INTIMIDATION, OR FRAUD;
(7) circulate, cause to be circulated, or file with an election authority a
petition that contains any false, forged, or fictitious signatures;
(8) sign a petition that the person is not legally qualified to sign; OR
(9) [sign a petition more than once; or
(10)] alter any petition after it is filed with the election authority.
(b) Each violation of this section shall be considered a separate offense.
(c) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and is subject to
the penalties provided in Subtitle 10 of this title.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.